Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Chapter 14 Radioactive Materials Transportation Management

§§ 37-14-101 and 37-14-102.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 90, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1989, ch. 109, § 1, related to the Pacific States Agreement on Radioactive Materials Transportation Management and a state designee to the Pacific States Agreement on Radioactive Materials Transportation Committee.

§ 37-14-103.
Emergency response fee.

In addition to any other fees and taxes provided by law, an emergency response fee of four hundred fifty dollars ($450.00) shall apply to each package of radioactive materials transported through this state. The department of transportation shall collect this fee when it issues a permit under W.S. 31-18-407(a). All emergency response fees collected by the department of transportation pursuant to this subsection and W.S. 31-18-407(a) shall be deposited in a separate account to be used for the payment of costs associated with training for and conducting emergency response procedures related to the transportation of radioactive materials.

As used in this section:

“Radioactive materials” means:

Highway route controlled quantities of radioactive materials as defined in 49 C.F.R. 173.403(l) as amended as of January 1, 1989; and

Nuclear waste being transported to the waste isolation pilot plant in New Mexico, to any facility established pursuant to section 135 of the federal “Nuclear Waste Policy Act of 1982” as amended, 42 U.S.C. 10101 et seq., to any repository licensed for the permanent deep geological disposal of high-level radioactive waste and spent nuclear fuel, or to any monitored retrievable storage facility established pursuant to section 141 of the federal “Nuclear Waste Policy Act of 1982” as amended.

“Package” means a container plus its contents that are assembled to assure compliance with the minimum federal packaging requirements for radioactive materials;

“Shipper” means the party or carrier responsible for shipments of radioactive materials under this section.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 109, § 2; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1996, ch. 90, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2022 ch. 68, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “separate account” for “fund within the special revenue fund” in (a).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in (a), substituted “four hundred fifty dollars ($450.00)” for “two hundred dollars ($200.00)” in the first sentence, substituted “when it issues a permit under W.S. 31-18-407(a)” for “based on a permit issued by the department which is not inconsistent with federal law. The department shall promulgate rules on issuing and revoking permits which are not inconsistent with federal law. The department shall promulgate rules on quarterly reporting and payment of fees, retention of records and audit requirements” in the second sentence, and added “collected by the department of transportation pursuant to this subsection and W.S. 31-18-407(a)” in the third sentence.

Nuclear Waste Policy Act. —

Sections 135 and 141 of the federal Nuclear Waste Policy Act, both referred to in subsection (b)(i)(B), appear as 42 U.S.C. §§ 10155 and 10161, respectively.

Editor's notes. —

The reference in subparagraph (b)(i)(A) to 49 C.F.R. 173.403(l) is apparently incorrect, as there is no subsection (l) in 49 C.F.R. 173.403.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 1, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”